Massachusetts, session 194th, H2277.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 159B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 6B the following section:-
Section 6B1/2. A city or town that accepts this section may establish a reduced maximum
rate for the involuntary towing away of motor vehicles within the city or town’s jurisdiction
when such towing is ordered by the police or other public authority due to a parking violation
during a declared snow emergency, natural disaster or extreme weather-related emergency, or
state of emergency related to the threat of a natural disaster; provided, that the reduced maximum
rate shall be equal to one-half of the maximum rate otherwise applicable in said city or town
pursuant to section 6B. Said reduced maximum rate shall only affect the portion of the rate
collected by a city or town. A city or town that establishes a reduced maximum rate pursuant to
this section shall include, in any contract between said city or town and a tow service provider to
provide tow services, a provision stating this reduced maximum rate.
of 1